Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.350

Legal services revolving fund—Enterprise services account—Approval of certain changes required.

Any rate increases proposed for or any change in the method of calculating charges from the legal services revolving fund or services provided in accordance with RCW 43.01.090 or 43.19.500 in the enterprise services account is subject to approval by the director of financial management prior to implementation.

[ 2015 c 225 s 87; 1998 c 105 s 16; 1981 c 270 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 270: See notes following RCW 43.88.010.

Enterprise services account: RCW 43.19.500.

Legal services revolving fund: RCW 43.10.150.